Nevada, session 83, AB440.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 616C.052 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
616C.052 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 617.485
and 617.487, if a police officer, a salaried or volunteer firefighter or
an arson investigator is exposed to a contagious disease:
(a) Upon battery by an offender; or
(b) While performing the duties of a police officer, firefighter or
arson investigator,
 the employer of the police officer, firefighter or arson
investigator shall create and maintain a report concerning the
exposure that includes, without limitation, the name of each police
officer, firefighter or arson investigator, as applicable, who was
exposed to the contagious disease and the name of each person, if
any, to whom the police officer, firefighter or arson investigator was
exposed.
2. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (d) of subsection
2 of NRS 616A.265, if the results of a physical examination
administered pursuant to NRS 617.455 or 617.457 to a police
officer, a salaried or volunteer firefighter or an arson investigator
after the commencement of employment reveal that the police
officer, firefighter or arson investigator tested positive for exposure
to tuberculosis, the police officer, firefighter or arson investigator is
eligible, during his or her lifetime, to receive compensation pursuant
to chapters 616A to 617, inclusive, of NRS for tuberculosis and any
additional diseases or conditions that are associated with or result
from tuberculosis.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 617.485 and 617.487,
if the employment of a police officer, a salaried or volunteer
firefighter or an arson investigator is terminated, voluntarily or
involuntarily, the employer of the police officer, firefighter or arson
investigator, regardless of whether the police officer, firefighter or
arson investigator has been exposed to a contagious disease during
his or her employment and regardless of whether the employer has
created or maintained a report concerning any exposure of the police
officer, firefighter or arson investigator to a contagious disease
pursuant to subsection 1, shall:
(a) [At] Within 30 days after the [time] date of termination and
at 3 months after the date of termination, provide to the police
officer, firefighter or arson investigator a purified protein derivative
-
*AB440*

– 3 –
skin test to screen for exposure to tuberculosis, unless the police
officer, firefighter or arson investigator previously submitted to such
a test and tested positive for exposure to tuberculosis. Except as
otherwise provided in paragraph (d) of subsection 2 of NRS
616A.265, if a skin test administered pursuant to this paragraph and
provided to the employer reveals that the police officer, firefighter
or arson investigator tested positive for exposure to tuberculosis, the
police officer, firefighter or arson investigator is eligible, during his
or her lifetime, to receive compensation pursuant to chapters 616A
to 617, inclusive, of NRS for tuberculosis and any additional
diseases or conditions that are associated with or result from
tuberculosis.
(b) Within 30 days after the date of termination and at not less
than 4 months but not more than 6 [and 12] months after the date
of termination, provide to the police officer, firefighter or arson
investigator a blood test or other appropriate test which is based on
the most recent recommendations of the Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention of the United States Department of Health
and Human Services or the American Medical Association, or
their successor organizations, to screen for other contagious
diseases, including, without limitation, hepatitis A, hepatitis B,
hepatitis C and human immunodeficiency virus, unless the police
officer, firefighter or arson investigator previously submitted to such
a test for a contagious disease and tested positive for exposure to
that contagious disease. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph
(d) of subsection 2 of NRS 616A.265, if a blood test or other
appropriate test administered pursuant to this paragraph and
provided to the employer reveals that the police officer, firefighter
or arson investigator has any other contagious disease or the
antibodies associated with a contagious disease, the police officer,
firefighter or arson investigator is eligible, during his or her lifetime,
to receive compensation pursuant to chapters 616A to 617,
inclusive, of NRS for such a disease and any additional diseases or
conditions that are associated with or result from the contagious
disease.
4. The former employer of a police officer, a salaried or
volunteer firefighter or an arson investigator shall pay all the costs
associated with providing skin and blood tests and other appropriate
tests required pursuant to subsection 3.
5. As used in this section, the term “battery” includes, without
limitation, the intentional propelling or placing, or the causing to be
propelled or placed, of any human excrement or bodily fluid upon
the person of an employee.
-
*AB440*

– 4 –
Sec. 2. NRS 617.485 is hereby amended to read as follows:
617.485 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
chapter and except as otherwise provided in this section, if an
employee has hepatitis, the disease is conclusively presumed to have
arisen out of and in the course of his or her employment if the
employee has been continuously employed for 5 years or more as a
police officer, full-time salaried firefighter or emergency medical
attendant in this State before the date of any temporary or permanent
disability or death resulting from the hepatitis.
2. Compensation awarded to a police officer, firefighter or
emergency medical attendant, or to the dependents of such a person,
for hepatitis pursuant to this section must include:
(a) Full reimbursement for related expenses incurred for medical
treatments, surgery and hospitalization; and
(b) The compensation provided in chapters 616A to 616D,
inclusive, of NRS for the disability or death.
3. A police officer, salaried firefighter or emergency medical
attendant shall:
(a) Submit to a blood test or other appropriate test which is
based on the most recent recommendations of the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention of the United States Department
of Health and Human Services or the American Medical
Association, or their successor organizations, to screen for
hepatitis C upon employment, upon the commencement of coverage
and thereafter on an annual basis during his or her employment.
(b) Submit to a blood test or other appropriate test which is
based on the most recent recommendations of the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention of the United States Department
of Health and Human Services or the American Medical
Association, or their successor organizations, to screen for
hepatitis A and hepatitis B upon employment, upon the
commencement of coverage and thereafter on an annual basis during
his or her employment, except that a police officer, salaried
firefighter or emergency medical attendant is not required to submit
to a blood test or other appropriate test to screen for hepatitis A and
hepatitis B on an annual basis during his or her employment if he or
she has been vaccinated for hepatitis A and hepatitis B upon
employment or at other medically appropriate times during his or
her employment. Each employer shall provide a police officer,
salaried firefighter or emergency medical attendant with the
opportunity to be vaccinated for hepatitis A and hepatitis B upon
employment and at other medically appropriate times during his or
her employment.
-
*AB440*

– 5 –
4. All blood tests or other appropriate tests required pursuant
to this section and all vaccinations provided pursuant to this section
must be paid for by the employer.
5. The provisions of this section:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), do not apply
to a police officer, firefighter or emergency medical attendant who
is diagnosed with hepatitis upon employment.
(b) Apply to a police officer, firefighter or emergency medical
attendant who is diagnosed with hepatitis upon employment if,
during the employment or within 1 year after the last day of the
employment, he or she is diagnosed with a different strain of
hepatitis.
(c) Apply to a police officer, firefighter or emergency medical
attendant who is diagnosed with hepatitis after the termination of the
employment if the diagnosis is made within 1 year after the last day
of the employment.
6. A police officer, firefighter or emergency medical attendant
who is determined to be:
(a) Partially disabled from an occupational disease pursuant to
the provisions of this section; and
(b) Incapable of performing, with or without remuneration, work
as a police officer, firefighter or emergency medical attendant,
 may elect to receive the benefits provided pursuant to NRS
616C.440 for a permanent total disability.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Emergency medical attendant” means a person licensed as
an attendant or certified as an emergency medical technician,
advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic pursuant to
chapter 450B of NRS, whose primary duties of employment are the
provision of emergency medical services.
(b) “Hepatitis” includes hepatitis A, hepatitis B, hepatitis C and
any additional diseases or conditions that are associated with or
result from hepatitis A, hepatitis B or hepatitis C.
(c) “Police officer” means a sheriff, deputy sheriff, officer of a
metropolitan police department or city police officer.
Sec. 3. NRS 617.487 is hereby amended to read as follows:
617.487 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
chapter and except as otherwise provided in this section, if an
employee has hepatitis, the disease is conclusively presumed to have
arisen out of and in the course of his or her employment if the
employee has been continuously employed for 5 years or more as a
police officer or a sheriff, deputy sheriff, officer of a metropolitan
police department or city police officer in this State before the date
of any temporary or permanent disability or death resulting from the
hepatitis.
-
*AB440*

– 6 –
2. Compensation awarded to a police officer, or to the
dependents of a police officer, for hepatitis pursuant to this section
must include:
(a) Full reimbursement for related expenses incurred for medical
treatments, surgery and hospitalization; and
(b) The compensation provided in chapters 616A to 616D,
inclusive, of NRS for the disability or death.
3. A police officer shall:
(a) Submit to a blood test or other appropriate test which is
based on the most recent recommendations of the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention of the United States Department
of Health and Human Services or the American Medical
Association, or their successor organizations, to screen for
hepatitis C upon employment and upon the commencement of
coverage.
(b) If the employer of the police officer provides screening for
hepatitis C for police officers on an annual basis, submit to a blood
test or other appropriate test which is based on the most recent
recommendations of the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services or the American Medical Association, or their successor
organizations, to screen for hepatitis C thereafter on an annual basis
during his or her employment.
(c) If the employer of the police officer provides screening for
hepatitis A and hepatitis B for police officers, submit to a blood test
or other appropriate test which is based on the most recent
recommendations of the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services or the American Medical Association, or their successor
organizations, to screen for hepatitis A and hepatitis B upon
employment, upon the commencement of coverage and thereafter on
an annual basis during his or her employment, except that a police
officer is not required to submit to a blood test or other appropriate
test to screen for hepatitis A and hepatitis B on an annual basis
during his or her employment if he or she has been vaccinated for
hepatitis A and hepatitis B upon employment or at other medically
appropriate times during his or her employment. Each employer
shall provide a police officer with the opportunity to be vaccinated
for hepatitis A and hepatitis B upon employment and at other
medically appropriate times during his or her employment.
4. All blood tests or other appropriate tests required pursuant
to this section and all vaccinations provided pursuant to this section
must be paid for by the employer.
5. The provisions of this section:
-
*AB440*

– 7 –
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), do not apply
to a police officer who is diagnosed with hepatitis upon
employment.
(b) Apply to a police officer who is diagnosed with hepatitis
upon employment if, during the employment or within 1 year after
the last day of the employment, the police officer is diagnosed with
a different strain of hepatitis.
(c) Apply to a police officer who is diagnosed with hepatitis
after the termination of the employment if the diagnosis is made
within 1 year after the last day of the employment.
6. A police officer who is determined to be:
(a) Partially disabled from an occupational disease pursuant to
the provisions of this section; and
(b) Incapable of performing, with or without remuneration, work
as a police officer,
 may elect to receive the benefits provided pursuant to NRS
616C.440 for a permanent total disability.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Hepatitis” includes hepatitis A, hepatitis B, hepatitis C and
any additional diseases or conditions that are associated with or
result from hepatitis A, hepatitis B or hepatitis C.
(b) “Police officer” means any police officer other than a sheriff,
deputy sheriff, officer of a metropolitan police department or city
police officer.
Sec. 4. The amendatory provisions of this act apply only to
claims filed on or after October 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB440*